nb: Sportsutstyr > Friidrett > Kunstløp og hockey > Treningshjelpemidler for kunstløp og hockey: Balansebrett for kunstløp og hockey; Hoppetau for kunstløp og hockey; Skyteskiver for kunstløp og hockey; Sklibrett for kunstløp og hockey; Strikkbånd for kunstløp og hockey; Treningsseler for kunstløp og hockey; Treningsmatter for kunstløp og hockey; Hoppetrenere for kunstløp; Spinnere for kunstløp; Tilbehør til passtreningsutstyr for hockey; Pasningstrenere for hockey; Motstandstrenere for hockey; Skyteputer for hockey; Hastighetstrening for hockey
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Atividade desportiva > Hóquei e patinagem artística > Auxiliares de treino para patinagem artística e hóquei: Tábua de equilíbrio para patinagem artística e hóquei; Cordas de saltar para hóquei e patinagem artística; Alvos de lançamento para hóquei e patinagem artística; Tábuas de deslize para patinagem artística e hóquei; Faixas de alongamento para patinagem artística e hóquei; Arneses de treino para patinagem artística e hóquei; Tapetes de treino para patinagem artística e hóquei; Artigos de treino de salto para patinagem artística; Spinners para hóquei e patinagem artística; Acessórios para equipamentos de treino de passes de hóquei; Artigos de treino de passe para hóquei; Treinadores de resistência de hóquei; Almofadas de lançamento para hóquei; Artigos de treino de velocidade para hóquei
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Спортни занимания > Фигурно пързаляне и хокей > Помощни средства за тренировка по фигурно пързаляне и хокей: Дъски за упражняване на баланс за фигурно пързаляне и хокей; Въжета за скачане за фигурно пързаляне и хокей; Мишени за фигурно пързаляне и хокей; Дъски за упражняване на пързаляне за фигурно пързаляне и хокей; Ленти за разтягане за фигурно пързаляне и хокей; Тренировъчни колани за фигурно пързаляне и хокей; Постелки за тренировка по фигурно пързаляне и хокей; Помощни средства за упражняване на скокове за фигурно пързаляне; Спинери за фигурно пързаляне; Аксесоари за треньор за подаване в хокей; Помощни средства за упражняване на подаване за хокей; Тренажори за съпротивление при хокей; Изкуствен лед за упражняване на удара към вратата за хокей; Помощни средства за упражняване на скорост на хокей
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Atletické sporty > Krasobruslení a hokej > Tréninkové pomůcky na krasobruslení a hokej: Balanční desky pro krasobruslení a hokej; Švihadla pro krasobruslení a hokej; Střelecké cíle na krasobruslení a hokej; Slideboardy na krasobruslení a hokej; Odporové gumy pro krasobruslení a hokej; Tréninkové postroje pro krasobruslení a hokej; Tréninkové podložky pro krasobruslení a hokej; Krasobruslařské pomůcky pro trénování výskoku; Deska na trénování piruet pro krasobruslení; Příslušenství k hokejovým nahrávačům; Pomůcky pro trénování hokejových přihrávek; Hokejové odporové trenažéry; Střelecké desky pro hokej; Hokejové pomůcky pro trénování rychlosti
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Šport > Umetnostno drsanje in hokej > Pripomočki za vadbo umetnostnega drsanja in hokeja: Ravnotežne plošče za umetnostno drsanje in hokej; Vrvi za skakanje za umetnostno drsanje in hokej; Tarče za umetnostno drsanje in hokej; Pripomočki za vadbo umetnostnega drsanja in hokeja; Elastični trakovi za raztezanje za umetnostno drsanje in hokej; Vadbeni pasovi za umetnostno drsanje in hokej; Vadbene podloge za umetnostno drsanje in hokej; Pripomočki za vadbo tehnik skakanja pri umetnostnem drsanju; Pripomočki za vadbo tehnik vrtenja pri umetnostnem drsanju; Dodatki za vadbo tehnik podaje pri hokeju; Pripomočki za vadbo tehnik podaje pri hokeju; Uporni trenažerji za hokej; Podloge za vadbo hokejskih strelov; Pripomočki za izboljšanje hitrosti pri hokeju
ko: 스포츠용품 > 운동 > 피겨 스케이팅/하키 > 피겨 스케이팅/하키 훈련 장비: 피겨 스케이팅/하키 밸런스 보드; 피겨 스케이팅/하키 점프 로프; 피겨 스케이팅/하키 슈팅 타겟; 피겨 스케이팅/하키 슬라이드 보드; 피겨 스케이팅/하키 스트레칭 밴드; 피겨 스케이팅/하키 훈련용 하니스; 피겨 스케이팅/하키 훈련 매트; 피겨 스케이팅 점프 트레이너; 피겨 스케이팅 스피너; 하키 패싱 트레이너 액세서리; 하키 패스 트레이너; 하키 저항 트레이너; 하키 슈팅 패드; 하키 스피드 트레이너
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > การกีฬา > สเกตลีลาและฮอกกี้ > อุปกรณ์ช่วยในการฝึกสเก็ตลีลาและฮอกกี้: กระดานทรงตัวสำหรับสเก็ตลีลาและฮอกกี้; เชือกกระโดดสำหรับสเก็ตลีลาและฮอกกี้; เป้าหมายการยิงในสเก็ตลีลาและฮอกกี้; กระดานเลื่อนสำหรับสเก็ตลีลาและฮอกกี้; ยางยืดสำหรับเล่นสเก็ตลีลาและฮอกกี้; สายรัดฝึกซ้อมสเก็ตลีลาและฮอกกี้; เสื่อฝึกซ้อมสเก็ตลีลาและฮอกกี้; ตัวช่วยฝึกซ้อมกระโดดในสเก็ตลีลา; แท่นหมุนในสเก็ตลีลา; อุปกรณ์เสริมสำหรับอุปกรณ์ฝึกส่งลูกฮอกกี้; ตัวช่วยซ้อมการส่งลูกฮอกกี้; อุปกรณ์ฝึกแรงต้านฮอกกี้; แผ่นรองยิงฮอกกี้; ตัวฝึกซ้อมความเร็วในฮอกกี้
it: Articoli sportivi > Sport > Pattinaggio di figura e hockey > Ausili per l'allenamento di pattinaggio artistico e hockey: Tavole per equilibrio per pattinaggio artistico e hockey; Corde per saltare per pattinaggio artistico e hockey; Bersagli di tiro per pattinaggio artistico e hockey; Tavole per pattinaggio artistico e hockey; Fasce elastiche per pattinaggio artistico e hockey; Imbracature da allenamento per pattinaggio artistico e hockey; Tappetini da allenamento per pattinaggio artistico e hockey; Scarpe da ginnastica per pattinaggio artistico; Spinner di pattinaggio di figura; Accessori per simulatori di passaggio per hockey; Dispositivi di allenamento per passaggi di hockey; Elastici di resistenza da hockey; Pad da tiro per hockey; Dispositivi di allenamento per hockey su ghiaccio
de: Sportartikel > Athletik > Eiskunstlauf & Hockey > Eiskunstlauf- & Hockey-Trainingshilfen: Eiskunstlauf- & Hockey-Balance Boards; Eiskunstlauf- & Hockey-Springseile; Eiskunstlauf- & Hockey-Zielscheiben; Eiskunstlauf- & Hockey-Gleitmatten; Eiskunstlauf- & Hockey-Dehnungsbänder; Eiskunstlauf- & Hockey-Trainingsgurte; Eiskunstlauf- & Hockey-Trainingsmatten; Eiskunstlauf-Sprungtrainer; Eiskunstlauf-Drehscheiben; Zubehör für Hockey-Passtrainer; Hockey-Passtrainer; Hockey-Widerstandstrainer; Hockey-Schussplatten; Hockey-Geschwindigkeitstrainer
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 競技體育 > 花式滑冰/冰上曲棍球 > 花式滑冰/冰上曲棍球訓練輔助工具: 花式滑冰/冰上曲棍球平衡板; 花式滑冰/冰上曲棍球跳繩; 花式滑冰/曲棍球練習靶; 花式滑冰/冰上曲棍球滑板; 花式滑冰/曲棍球拉伸帶; 花式滑冰/冰上曲棍球訓練背帶; 花式滑冰/冰上曲棍球訓練護具; 花式滑冰跳躍訓練用品; 花式滑冰旋轉訓練用品; 曲棍球傳球訓練器配件; 冰上曲棍球傳球訓練用品; 冰球阻力訓練器; 冰上曲棍球射球練習墊; 冰上曲棍球速度訓練用品
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Điền kinh > Trượt băng nghệ thuật và khúc côn cầu > Dụng cụ hỗ trợ luyện tập trượt băng nghệ thuật & khúc côn cầu: Ván luyện tập thăng bằng trượt băng nghệ thuật & khúc côn cầu; Dây nhảy tập luyện trượt băng nghệ thuật và khúc côn cầu; Bia mục tiêu trượt băng nghệ thuật và khúc côn cầu; Ván trượt luyện tập trượt băng nghệ thuật & khúc côn cầu; Dây kháng lực tập luyện trượt băng nghệ thuật & khúc côn cầu; Dây an toàn luyện tập trượt băng nghệ thuật & khúc côn cầu; Thảm luyện tập trượt băng nghệ thuật & khúc côn cầu; Dụng cụ hỗ trợ tập nhảy trượt băng nghệ thuật; Bàn xoay tập luyện trượt băng nghệ thuật; Phụ kiện dụng cụ tập chuyền khúc côn cầu; Dụng cụ hỗ trợ tập chuyền bóng khúc côn cầu; Dụng cụ tập sức bền khúc côn cầu; Tấm đệm tập đánh bóng khúc côn cầu; Dụng cụ hỗ trợ tập luyện tốc độ khúc côn cầu
nl: Sportartikelen > Lichaamssporten > Kunstrijden en ijshockey > Benodigdheden voor kunstrijd- en ijshockeytraining: Balansborden voor kunstrijden en ijshockey; Springtouwen voor kunstrijden en ijshockey; Schietdoelwitten voor kunstrijden en ijshockey; Glijplanken voor kunstrijden en ijshockey; Rekbanden voor kunstrijden en ijshockey; Harnassen voor kunstrijd- en ijshockeytraining; Matten voor kunstrijd- en ijshockeytraining; Springtrainers voor kunstrijden; Spinners voor kunstrijden; Accessoires voor passingtrainers voor hockey; Hockeypasseertrainers; Weerstandstrainers voor hockey; Hockeyschietpads; Hockeysnelheidstrainers
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 田径 > 花样滑冰与冰球 > 花样滑冰/冰球训练辅助用品: 花样滑冰/冰球平衡板; 花样滑冰/冰球跳绳; 花样滑冰/冰球击球靶; 花样滑冰/冰球滑板; 花样滑冰/冰球拉伸带; 花样滑冰/冰球训练背带; 花样滑冰/冰球训练垫; 花样滑冰跳跃训练鞋; 花样滑冰旋转器; 冰球传球训练器配件; 冰球传球训练器; 冰球阻力训练器; 冰球击球垫; 冰球速度训练器
ja: スポーツ用品 > スポーツ競技 > フィギュアスケート・アイスホッケー用品 > フィギュアスケート・アイスホッケー練習器具: フィギュアスケート・アイスホッケー用バランスボード; フィギュアスケート・アイスホッケー用ジャンプロープ; フィギュアスケート・アイスホッケー用シュートターゲット; フィギュアスケート・アイスホッケー用スライドボード; フィギュアスケートとホッケーのストレッチバンド; フィギュアスケート・アイスホッケー用トレーニングハーネス; フィギュアスケート・アイスホッケー用トレーニングマット; フィギュアスケート用ジャンプトレーナー; フィギュアスケート用スピナー; ホッケー用パッシングトレーナーアクセサリー; アイスホッケー用パストレーナー; ホッケー用レジスタンストレーナー; アイスホッケー用シューティングパッド; アイスホッケー用スピードトレーナー
en: Sporting Goods > Athletics > Figure Skating & Hockey > Figure Skating & Hockey Training Aids: Figure Skating & Hockey Balance Boards; Figure Skating & Hockey Jump Ropes; Figure Skating & Hockey Shooting Targets; Figure Skating & Hockey Slide Boards; Figure Skating & Hockey Stretching Bands; Figure Skating & Hockey Training Harnesses; Figure Skating & Hockey Training Mats; Figure Skating Jump Trainers; Figure Skating Spinners; Hockey Passing Trainer Accessories; Hockey Passing Trainers; Hockey Resistance Trainers; Hockey Shooting Pads; Hockey Speed Trainers
fr: Équipements sportifs > Divers sports > Patinage artistique et hockey > Aides à l'entraînement pour le patinage artistique et le hockey: Planches d'équilibre de patinage artistique et de hockey; Cordes à sauter pour patinage artistique et hockey; Cibles de tir pour patinage artistique et hockey; Planches à glissière pour patinage artistique et hockey; Bandes d'étirement pour patinage artistique et hockey; Harnais d'entraînement pour patinage artistique et hockey; Tapis d'entraînement pour patinage artistique et hockey; Entraînement saut de patinage artistique; Spinners de patinage artistique; Accessoires d'entraîneurs de passes de hockey; Entraînement aux passes de hockey; Équipements de résistance pour le hockey; Tapis de tir pour hockey; Entraînement à la vitesse pour hockey
hu: Sportszerek > Atlétika > Műkorcsolya és jégkorong > Műkorcsolya és jégkorong edzési segédeszközök: Műkorcsolya- és jégkorong-egyensúlytáblák; Műkorcsolya- és jégkorong-ugrókötelek; Műkorcsolya- és jégkorong-lövőcélok; Műkorcsolya- és jégkorong-egyensúlytáblák; Műkorcsolya- és jégkorong-nyújtószalagok; Műkorcsolya- és jégkorong-edzőheveredek; Műkorcsolya- és jégkorong-edzőszőnyegek; Műkorcsolya-ugróoktatók; Műkorcsolya-forgók; Jégkorong-passzoló edzőeszköz-kiegészítők; Jégkorong-passzedzők; Jégkorong ellenállásos edzőeszközök; Jégkorong-lövőbetétek; Jégkorong-sebességedzők
sv: Sportartiklar > Idrott och sport > Konståkning och hockey > Träningshjälpmedel för konståkning och hockey: Balansskivor för konståkning och hockey; Hopprep för konståkning och hockey; Skottmål för konståkning och hockey; Glidskivor för konståkning och hockey; Stretchband för konståkning och hockey; Träningsselar för konståkning och hockey; Träningsmattor för konståkning och hockey; Hopptränare för konståkning; Konståkningsspinners; Tillbehör för passningstränare i ishockey; Hockeypassningstränare; Motståndstränare för ishockey; Hockeyskottdynor; Hockeyhastighetstränare
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Artigos para prática de esportes > Patinação artística e hóquei > Auxílios de treinamento para patinação artística e hóquei: Pranchas de equilíbrio para patinação artística e hóquei; Cordas de salto para patinação artística e hóquei; Alvos de tiros para patinação artística e hóquei; Pranchas de deslizamento para patinação artística e hóquei; Faixas de alongamento para patinação artística e hóquei; Arneses de treinamento para patinação artística e hóquei; Tapetes de treinamento para patinação artística e hóquei; Treinadores de salto para patinação artística; Spinners de patinação artística; Acessórios para treinadores de passe de hóquei; Treinadores de passes de hóquei; Treinadores de resistência de hóquei; Almofadas de tiro de hóquei; Treinadores de velocidade para hóquei
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Atletika > Dailusis čiuožimas ir ledo ritulys > Dailiojo čiuožimo ir ledo ritulio treniruočių pagalbinės priemonės: Dailiojo čiuožimo ir ledo ritulio balanso lentos; Dailusis čiuožimas ir ledo ritulio šokdynės; Dailiojo čiuožimo ir ledo ritulio taikiniai; Dailiojo čiuožimo ir ledo ritulio slydimo lentos; Dailiojo čiuožimo ir ledo ritulio tempimo juostos; Dailiojo čiuožimo ir ledo ritulio treniruočių apraišai; Dailiojo čiuožimo ir ledo ritulio treniruočių kilimėliai; Dailiojo čiuožimo šuolių treniruokliai; Dailiojo čiuožimo suktukai; Ledo ritulio perdavimų treniruoklių priedai; Ledo ritulio perdavimų treniruokliai; Ledo ritulio pasipriešinimo treniruokliai; Ledo ritulio smūgiavimo kilimėliai; Ledo ritulio greičio treniruokliai
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Equipamiento para atletismo > Patinaje artístico y hockey > Ayudas para el entrenamiento de hockey y patinaje artístico: Tablas de equilibrio para patinaje artístico y hockey; Cuerdas para saltar para patinaje artístico y hockey; Dianas de tiro para patinaje artístico y hockey; Tablas deslizantes para patinaje artístico y hockey; Bandas de estiramiento para patinaje artístico y hockey; Arneses de entrenamiento para patinaje artístico y hockey; Tapetes de entrenamiento para patinaje artístico y hockey; Zapatillas de salto de patinaje artístico; Cuchillas de patinaje artístico; Accesorios para entrenadores de pases de hockey; Entrenadores de pases de hockey; Entrenadores de resistencia para hockey; Almohadillas de tiro de hockey; Entrenadores de velocidad de hockey
da: Sportsartikler > Atletik > Kunstskøjteløb og ishockey > Hjælpemidler til kunstskøjteløb og hockey: Balancebrætter til kunstskøjteløb og hockey; Reb til kunstskøjteløb og hockey; Skydemål til kunstskøjteløb og hockey; Skydebrætter til kunstskøjteløb og hockey; Bånd til kunstskøjteløb og hockey; Træningsseler til kunstskøjteløb og hockey; Træningsmåtter til kunstskøjteløb og hockey; Springtrænere til kunstskøjteløb; Spinnere til kunstskøjteløb; Tilbehør til afleveringstrænere til ishockey; Afleveringstrænere til hockey; Modstandstrænere til hockey; Skydepuder til hockey; Farttrænere til hockey
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Αθλητισμός > Καλλιτεχνικό πατινάζ & χόκεϊ > Προπονητικά βοηθήματα πατινάζ & χόκεϊ: Σανίδες ισορροπίας πατινάζ & χόκεϊ; Σχοινάκια άλματος πατινάζ & χόκεϊ; Στόχοι βολών πατινάζ & χόκεϊ; Σανίδες ολίσθησης πατινάζ & χόκεϊ; Ιμάντες διάτασης πατινάζ & χόκεϊ; Εξαρτύσεις προπόνησης πατινάζ & χόκεϊ; Στρώματα προπόνησης πατινάζ & χόκεϊ; Προπονητές άλματος πατινάζ; Περιστρεφόμενοι εξοπλισμοί πατινάζ; Αξεσουάρ οργάνων προπόνησης πασών χόκεϊ; Προπονητές πάσας χόκεϊ; Εξοπλισμός προπόνησης με αντίσταση χόκεϊ; Μαξιλάρια σουτ χόκεϊ; Προπονητές ταχύτητας χόκεϊ
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Atletism > Patinaj artistic și hochei > Articole antrenament patinaj artistic și hochei: Plăci pentru echilibru pentru patinaj artistic și hochei; Corzi pentru patinaj artistic și hochei; Ținte pentru patinaj artistic și hochei; Plăci glisante pentru patinaj artistic și hochei; Benzi pentru întindere pentru patinaj artistic și hochei; Hamuri de antrenament pentru patinaj artistic și hochei; Covorașe de antrenament pentru patinaj artistic și hochei; Articole antrenament sărituri patinaj artistic; Articole pentru piruete patinaj artistic; Accesorii pentru sisteme de antrenament al paselor la hochei; Articole antrenament pase pentru hochei; Dispozitive de rezistență pentru antrenament de hochei; Paduri pentru lovituri pentru hochei; Articole antrenament viteză pentru hochei
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Sport > Łyżwiarstwo figurowe i hokej > Pomoce treningowe do łyżwiarstwa figurowego i hokeja: D eski do balansowania do łyżwiarstwa figurowego i hokeja; Skakanki do łyżwiarstwa figurowego i hokeja; Tarcze strzeleckie do łyżwiarstwa figurowego i hokeja; Deski do łyżwiarstwa figurowego i hokeja; Taśmy rozciągające do łyżwiarstwa figurowego i hokeja; Uprzęże treningowe do łyżwiarstwa figurowego i hokeja; Maty treningowe do łyżwiarstwa figurowego i hokeja; Trenażery do łyżwiarstwa figurowego wyskoki; Trenażery do łyżwiarstwa figurowego obroty; Akcesoria do trenażerów podań do hokeja; Trenażery do hokeja podania; Trenażery oporowe do hokeja; Tablice trenerskie do hokeja do strzałów; Trenażery do hokeja szybkość
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Atletika > Krasokorčuľovanie a hokej > Tréningové pomôcky na krasokorčuľovanie a hokej: Balančné dosky na krasokorčuľovanie a hokej; Švihadlá pre krasokorčuľovanie a hokej; Strelecké terče pre krasokorčuľovanie a hokej; Trenažér korčuľovania na krasokorčuľovanie a hokej; Krasokorčuliarske a hokejové strečingové pásy; Tréningové postroje na krasokorčuľovanie a hokej; Tréningové podložky na krasokorčuľovanie a hokej; Krasokorčuliarske trenažéry skokov; Otočné trenažéry pre krasokorčuľovanie; Príslušenstvo pre trénovanie hokejových prihrávok; Hokejové trenažéry prihrávok; Hokejové posilňovacie trenažéry; Hokejové strelecké chrániče; Hokejové rýchlostné trenažéry
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Atletika > Umjetničko klizanje i hokej > Pomagala za vježbanje umjetničkog klizanja i hokeja: Ploče za ravnotežu za umjetničko klizanje i hokej; Uže za preskakanje za umjetničko klizanje i hokej; Mete za umjetničko klizanje i hokej; Daske za klizanje na ledu za umjetničko klizanje i hokej; Trake za rastezanje za umjetničko klizanje i hokej; Pojasevi za umjetničko klizanje i hokej; Podloge za umjetničko klizanje i hokej; Trenažeri za skakanje za umjetničko klizanje; Spinneri za umjetničko klizanje; Dodaci za trenažere za dodavanje za hokej; Trenažeri za dodavanje za hokej; Trenažeri za otpor za hokej; Podloge za gađanje u hokeju; Trenažeri za brzinu za hokej
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Urheilu > Taitoluistelu ja jääkiekko > Taitoluistelun ja jääkiekon harjoitteluvälineet: Taitoluistelun ja jääkiekon tasapainolevyt; Taitoluistelun ja jääkiekon hyppynarut; Taitoluistelun ja jääkiekon maalitaulut; Taitoluistelun ja jääkiekon liukulevyt; Taitoluistelun ja jääkiekon venytysnauhat; Taitoluistelun ja jääkiekon harjoitteluvaljaat; Taitoluistelun ja jääkiekon harjoittelumatot; Taitoluistelun hyppyjen harjoitteluvälineet; Taitoluistelun piruettiapurit; Jääkiekon syöttöharjoittelulaitteiden lisävarusteet; Jääkiekon syöttöjen harjoitteluvälineet; Jääkiekon vastusharjoitusvälineet; Jääkiekon ammuntatyynyt; Jääkiekon nopeusharjoitteluvälineet
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Spor Ekipmanları > Artistik Paten ve Hokey > Artistik Patinaj ve Hokey Eğitim Araçları: Artistik Patinaj ve Hokey Denge Tahtaları; Artistik Patinaj ve Hokey Atlama İpleri; Artistik Patinaj ve Hokey Atış Hedefleri; Artistik Patinaj ve Hokey Kaydırakları; Artistik Patinaj ve Hokey Esnetme Bantları; Artistik Patinaj ve Hokey Antrenman Kemerleri; Artistik Patinaj ve Hokey Antrenman Minderleri; Artistik Patinaj Atlama Eğitmenleri; Artistik Patinaj Spinner'ları; Hokey pas çalışma aleti aksesuarları; Hokey Pas Eğitmenleri; Hokey direnç antrenman ekipmanları; Hokey Atış Pedleri; Hokey Hız Eğitmenleri
ru: Спортивные товары > Соревновательный спорт > Хоккей и фигурное катание > Тренировочный инвентарь для хоккея и фигурного катания: Балансировочные доски для тренировок по хоккею и фигурному катанию; Скакалки для тренировок по хоккею и фигурному катанию; Мишени для тренировок по хоккею и фигурному катанию; Слайд-доски для тренировок по хоккею и фигурному катанию; Ленты-эспандеры для тренировок по хоккею и фигурному катанию; Жилеты-упряжи для тренировок по хоккею и фигурному катанию; Коврики для тренировок по хоккею и фигурному катанию; Лонжи для тренировок по фигурному катанию; Спиннеры для тренировок по фигурному катанию; Аксессуары для тренажеров хоккейного паса; Пассеры для тренировок по хоккею; Хоккейные тренажеры с сопротивлением; Искусственный лед для отработки бросков по воротам; Хоккейные тренажеры для дриблинга